District of Columbia statutes.
47-4629

Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Project tax exemptions.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“AMI” means the median income for the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area.

(2)

“Developer” means CJUF II Park Place at Petworth, LLC, CHVP26, LLC, or Highland Park West, LLC, and their successors, affiliates, and assigns, either collectively or individually.

(3)

“Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Projects” means the acquisition, development, construction, installation, and equipping, including the financing, refinancing, or reimbursing of costs incurred, of the mixed-use multi-family residential and retail projects located at 850 Quincy Street, N.W., the southwest corner of Irving Street and 14th Street, N.W., and 1444 Irving Street, N.W., either collectively or individually, consisting of:

(A)

For Park Place at Petworth:

(i)

A condominium/apartment house of 161 units totaling approximately 138,899 square feet of net residential floor area, including a minimum of 27,780 square feet devoted to affordable housing, with 5% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 30% of AMI, 10% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 50% of AMI, and 5% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 60% of AMI;

(ii)

Approximately 17,200 square feet of retail space; and

(iii)

A below-grade parking garage;

(B)

For Highland Park:

(i)

A condominium/apartment house of 229 units totaling approximately 206,490 square feet of net residential floor area, including a minimum of 41,298 square feet devoted to affordable housing, with 5% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 30% of AMI, 5% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 60% of AMI, and 10% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 80% of AMI;

(ii)

Approximately 17,069 square feet of net retail space; and

(iii)

A below-grade parking garage;

(C)

For Highland Park Phase II: A condominium/apartment house with a minimum of 69 units, totaling a minimum of 63,221 square feet net rentable square feet of residential area, including a minimum of 12,644 square feet of the gross residential floor area being devoted to affordable housing, with 5% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 30% of AMI, 5% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 60% of AMI, and 10% of net residential square foot area for residents with an income not exceeding 80% of AMI, and a community-based residential facility with 82 beds and approximately 26,429 gross square feet of building area.

(4)

“Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Properties” means the real property, including any improvements constructed thereon, located on Lot 44, Square 2900, as recorded on Page 76, Book 199 in the Office of the Surveyor for the District of Columbia; located on Lot 884 (Part of Lot 727), Square 2672, as recorded on Page 9, Book 199 in the Office of the Surveyor for the District of Columbia; and located on Lot 726, Square 2672, recorded in Page 9, Book 199 (or as the land for such lots may be subdivided into a record lot or lots or assessment and taxation lots, condominium lots, air rights lots, or any combination in the future), either collectively or individually.

(b)

Beginning on October 1, 2010, the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Properties shall be exempt from the real property tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title for 20 years as follows: 10 years at 50% and a 5% increase in years 11 through 20 until the annual real property taxation equals 100%.

(b-1)

All interest and penalties associated with real property taxes that have been assessed for the period beginning on October 1, 2008, and ending 45 days after [September 24, 2010], against the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, or Highland Park Phase II Properties, shall be forgiven, and any payments already made for this period, as of [September 24, 2010], shall be refunded or credited against real property taxes owed on the properties.

(c)

The tax exemption pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other tax relief or assistance from any other source applicable to the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Projects, the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and the Highland Park Phase II Properties, or the developer.

(d)

This section shall not:

(1)

Prevent or restrict the developer from utilizing any other tax, development, or other economic incentives available to the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and the Highland Park Phase II Projects, the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Properties, or the developer.

(2)

Limit the owner of the Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, or the Highland Park Phase II Properties from appealing or contesting its real estate tax assessment.

Mar. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-128, § 2(b), 57 DCR 1186
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7023, 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 134, 59 DCR 6190

History

D.C. Law 18-223 rewrote subsec. (b); and added subsec. (b-1). Prior to amendment, subsec. (b) read as follows: “(b) The Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Properties shall be exempt from real property taxation under Chapter 8 of this title for 20 consecutive years as follows: 10 years at 100% and a 10% increase in years 11 through 20 until the annual real property taxation equals 100%.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section 3 of D.C. Law 18-128, see § 7022 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7023 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 7021 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle C of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Park Place at Petworth, Highland Park, and Highland Park Phase II Economic Development Amendment Act of 2010”.

Short Title

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-128 provided:

“Sec. 3. Applicability. (a) This act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

“(b) Section 2 shall apply to tax years beginning October 1, 2008.”

Section 7022 of D.C. Law 18-223 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 18-128.